New York, session 2025-2026, A1474.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 1, 5, paragraph c of subdivision 6 and subdi- 2 visions 7 and 8 of section 2 of a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending 3 the environmental conservation law relating to establishing the climate 4 change adaptation cost recovery program; and amending the state finance 5 law relating to establishing the climate change adaptation fund, as 6 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 2129-B and A. 3351-B, are 7 amended to read as follows: 8 1. Climate change, resulting primarily from the combustion of fossil 9 fuels, is an immediate, grave threat to the state's communities, envi- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02898-01-5 A. 1474 2 1 ronment, and economy. In addition to mitigating the further buildup of 2 greenhouse gases, the state must take action to adapt to certain conse- 3 quences of climate change that are irreversible, including rising sea 4 levels, increasing temperatures, extreme weather events, flooding, heat 5 waves, [toxic] harmful algal blooms and other climate-change-driven 6 threats. Maintaining New York's quality of life into the future, 7 particularly for young people, who will experience greater impacts from 8 climate change over their lifetimes, will be one of the state's greatest 9 challenges over the next three decades. Meeting that challenge will 10 require a shared commitment of purpose, huge investments in new or 11 upgraded infrastructure, and new revenue sources to pay for those 12 investments. 13 5. The obligation to pay under the program is based on the fossil fuel 14 companies' historic contribution to the buildup of greenhouse gases that 15 is largely responsible for climate change. The program operates under a 16 standard of strict liability; companies are required to pay into the 17 fund based on the amount of historic greenhouse gas emissions attribut- 18 able to greenhouse gas-producing fossil fuels which they are responsible 19 for extracting and refining, because the use of [their] products derived 20 from such fossil fuels caused [the] such pollution. No finding of wrong- 21 doing is required. 22 c. The total assessment [rate] of [$3] $75 billion dollars [per year] 23 represents a small percentage of the extraordinary cost to New York 24 State for repairing from and preparing for climate change-driven extreme 25 events over the next 25 years, and is designed to have a meaningful 26 impact on the burden borne by New York State taxpayers for climate adap- 27 tation while being sufficiently limited so as to not impose a punitive 28 negative impact on an industry in which just the three largest domestic 29 oil and gas producers made a combined $85.6 billion in profits in 2023. 30 Recent science has determined that the largest one hundred fossil fuel 31 producing companies are responsible for more than 70% of global green- 32 house gas emissions since 1988, and therefore bear a much higher share 33 of responsibility for climate damage to New York State than is repres- 34 ented by the $75 billion being assessed them. 35 7. A covered period of [2000-2018] 2000-2024 has been selected. Over 36 70 percent of the total increase in greenhouse gas concentrations since 37 the Industrial Revolution has occurred since 1950, with a marked 38 increase in the rate of emissions after the year 2000. By 2000 the 39 science of climate change was well established, and no reasonable corpo- 40 rate actor could have failed to anticipate regulatory action to address 41 its impacts. In addition, the data necessary to attribute proportional 42 responsibility is very robust in the covered period. 43 8. This act is not intended to intrude on the authority of the feder- 44 al government in areas where it has preempted the right of the states to 45 legislate. This [act] program is remedial in nature, seeking compen- 46 sation for damages resulting from the past actions of polluters. 47 § 2. Section 76-0105 of the environmental conservation law, as added 48 by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the environmental conservation 49 law relating to establishing the climate change adaptation cost recovery 50 program; and amending the state finance law relating to establishing the 51 climate change adaptation fund, as proposed in legislative bills numbers 52 S.2129-B and A. 3351-B, is REPEALED. 53 § 3. Sections 76-0101 and 76-0103 of the environmental conservation 54 law, as added by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the environ- 55 mental conservation law relating to establishing the climate change 56 adaptation cost recovery program; and amending the state finance law A. 1474 3 1 relating to establishing the climate change adaptation fund, as proposed 2 in legislative bills numbers S. 2129-B and A. 3351-B, are amended and a 3 new section 76-0105 is added to read as follows: 4 § 76-0101. Definitions. 5 For the purposes of this article the following terms shall have the 6 following meanings: 7 1. "Affiliate" means, with respect to any specified entity, an entity 8 that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, 9 controls or is controlled by, or is under common control with, the enti- 10 ty specified. 11 2. "Applicable payment date" means [September thirtieth] December 12 thirty-first of the [second] fourth calendar year following the year in 13 which this article is enacted into law. 14 [2.] 3. "Climate change adaptive infrastructure project" means an 15 infrastructure project for purposes of climate change adaptation that: 16 a. includes but is not limited to projects designed to avoid, moder- 17 ate, repair, or adapt to negative impacts caused by climate change, and 18 to assist communities, households, and businesses in preparing for 19 future climate change-driven disruptions. Such [projects] project types 20 include but are not limited to restoring coastal wetlands and developing 21 other nature-based solutions and coastal protections; upgrading storm 22 water drainage systems; making defensive upgrades to roads, bridges, 23 subways, and transit systems; preparing for and recovering from hurri- 24 canes and other extreme weather events; undertaking preventive health 25 care programs and providing medical care to treat illness or injury 26 caused by the effects of climate change; relocating, elevating, or 27 retrofitting [sewage] wastewater treatment plants vulnerable to flood- 28 ing; installing energy efficient cooling systems and other weatheriza- 29 tion and energy efficiency upgrades and retrofits in public and private 30 buildings, including schools and public housing; upgrading parts of the 31 electrical grid to increase stability and resilience, including support- 32 ing the creation of self-sufficient clean energy microgrids; addressing 33 urban heat island effects through green spaces, urban forestry, and 34 other interventions; and responding to [toxic algae] harmful algal 35 blooms, loss of agricultural topsoil, and other climate-driven ecosystem 36 threats to forests, farms, fisheries, and food systems; and 37 b. is guided by the project criteria identified in the statewide 38 climate change adaptation and resilience plan adopted pursuant to subdi- 39 vision six of section 76-0103 of this article. 40 [3. "Coal" shall have the same definition as in section 1-103 of the 41 energy law.] 42 4. "Control" (including the terms controlling, controlled by and 43 under common control with) means the possession, direct or indirect, of 44 the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and poli- 45 cies of an entity, whether through the ownership of voting securities, 46 by contract, or otherwise. 47 5. "Controlled group" means two or more entities [treated as a single 48 employer under section 52(a) or (b) or section 414(m) or (o) of the 49 Internal Revenue Code. In applying subsections (a) and (b) of section 50 52, section 1563 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applied without 51 regard to subsection (b)(2)(C). For purposes of this article, entities 52 in a controlled group are treated as a single entity for purposes of 53 meeting the definition of responsible party and are jointly and 54 severally liable for payment of any cost recovery demand owed by any 55 entity in the controlled group] that are affiliates of each other. 56 [5.] 6. "Cost recovery amount" means seventy-five billion dollars. A. 1474 4 1 7. "Cost recovery demand" means [a charge asserted against] the 2 portion of the cost recovery amount determined by the department pursu- 3 ant to the program to be owed by a responsible party [for cost recovery 4 payments under the program] for payment to the fund. 5 [6.] 8. "Covered greenhouse gas emissions" means, with respect to any 6 entity, the total quantity of greenhouse [gases released into the atmos- 7 phere during the covered period] gas emissions, expressed in metric tons 8 of carbon dioxide equivalent, as defined in section 75-0101 of this 9 chapter, [including but not limited to releases of greenhouse gases 10 resulting from the extraction, storage, production, refinement, trans- 11 port, manufacture, distribution, sale, and use of fossil fuels or petro- 12 leum products extracted, produced, refined, or sold by such entity] 13 attributable to the total amount of fossil fuels extracted by that enti- 14 ty during the covered period, as well as the total amount of crude oil 15 refined by that entity during the covered period. For the purposes of 16 this article, covered greenhouse gas emissions include those emissions 17 attributable to all fossil fuel extraction and refining worldwide by 18 such entity and are not limited to such emissions within the state. 19 [7.] 9. "Covered period" means the period that began January first, 20 two thousand and ended on December thirty-first, two thousand [eighteen] 21 twenty-four. 22 [8.] 10. "Crude oil" means oil or petroleum of any kind and in any 23 form, including bitumen, oil sands, heavy oil, conventional and uncon- 24 ventional oil, shale oil, natural gas liquids, condensates, and related 25 fossil fuels. 26 [9.] 11. "Entity" means any individual, trustee, agent, partnership, 27 association, corporation, company, municipality, political subdivision, 28 or other legal organization, [including a foreign nation,] that holds or 29 held an ownership interest in a fossil fuel business during the covered 30 period. For purposes of this article, entities in a controlled group are 31 treated as a single entity for the purposes of meeting the definition of 32 responsible party and shall be jointly and severally liable for payment 33 of any cost recovery demand owed by any entity in the controlled group. 34 [10.] 12. "Fossil fuel" shall have the same definition as in section 35 1-103 of the energy law. 36 [11.] 13. "Fossil fuel business" means a business engaging in the 37 extraction of fossil fuels or the refining of petroleum products. 38 [12. "Fuel gases" shall have the same definition as in section 1-103 39 of the energy law. 40 13.] 14. "Fund" means the climate change adaptation fund established 41 pursuant to section ninety-seven-m of the state finance law. 42 [14.] 15. "Greenhouse gas" shall have the same definition as in 43 section 75-0101 of this chapter. 44 [15.] 16. "Nature-based solutions" shall mean projects that utilize or 45 mimic nature or natural processes and functions and that may also offer 46 environmental, economic, and social benefits, while increasing resili- 47 ence. Nature-based solutions include both green and natural infrastruc- 48 ture. 49 [16.] 17. "Notice of cost recovery demand" means the written communi- 50 cation informing an entity that they are a responsible party and of the 51 amount of the cost recovery demand payable to the fund. 52 [17.] 18. "Petroleum products" shall have the same definition as in 53 section 1-103 of the energy law. 54 [18.] 19. "Program" means the climate change adaptation cost recovery 55 program established under section 76-0103 of this article. A. 1474 5 1 [19.] 20. "Qualifying expenditure" means [an authorized] a payment 2 from the fund in support of a climate change adaptive infrastructure 3 project, including its operation and maintenance, as defined by the 4 department. 5 [20.] 21. "Responsible party" means any entity (or a successor in 6 interest to such entity described herein), which, during any part of the 7 covered period, was engaged in the trade or business of extracting 8 fossil fuel or refining crude oil and is determined by the department to 9 be responsible for more than one billion tons of covered greenhouse gas 10 emissions. The term responsible party shall not include any person who 11 lacks sufficient [connection] contacts with the state to satisfy the 12 [nexus requirements] due process clause of the United States Constitu- 13 tion. 14 § 76-0103. The climate change adaptation cost recovery program. 15 1. There is hereby established a climate change adaptation cost recov- 16 ery program to be administered by the department. 17 2. The purposes of the program shall be the following: 18 a. To secure compensatory payments from responsible parties based on a 19 standard of strict liability to provide a source of revenue for climate 20 change adaptive infrastructure projects within the state. Such payments 21 in aggregate shall total the cost recovery amount and shall be due and 22 payable on the applicable payment date. 23 b. To determine proportional liability of responsible parties for the 24 cost recovery amount pursuant to subdivision three of this section; 25 c. To impose cost recovery demands on responsible parties and issue 26 notices of cost recovery [demands] demand; 27 d. To accept and collect payment from responsible parties; 28 e. To identify climate change adaptive infrastructure projects; 29 f. To disperse funds to climate change adaptive infrastructure 30 projects; and 31 g. To allocate funds in such a way as to achieve a goal that at least 32 forty percent of the qualified expenditures from the program, but not 33 less than thirty-five percent of such expenditures, shall go to climate 34 change adaptive infrastructure projects that benefit disadvantaged 35 communities as defined in section 75-0101 of this chapter. 36 3. a. A responsible party shall be strictly liable, without regard to 37 fault, for a share of the cost recovery amount, which shall be used for 38 the costs of climate change adaptive infrastructure projects, including 39 their operation and maintenance, supported by the fund. 40 b. With respect to each responsible party, the cost recovery demand 41 shall be equal to an amount that bears the same ratio to [seventy-five 42 billion dollars] the cost recovery amount as the responsible party's 43 applicable share of covered greenhouse gas emissions bears to the aggre- 44 gate applicable shares of covered greenhouse gas emissions of all 45 responsible parties. 46 c. The applicable share of covered greenhouse gas emissions taken into 47 account under this section for any responsible party shall be the amount 48 by which the covered greenhouse gas emissions attributable to such 49 responsible party exceeds one billion metric tons. 50 d. [Where an entity owns a minority interest in another entity of ten 51 percent or more, the calculation of the entity's applicable share of 52 greenhouse gas emissions taken into account under this section shall 53 include the applicable share of greenhouse gas emissions taken into 54 account under this section by the entity in which the responsible party 55 holds a minority interest, multiplied by the percentage of the minority 56 interest held. A. 1474 6 1 e.] In determining the amount of greenhouse gas emissions attributable 2 to any entity, [an amount equivalent to nine hundred forty-two and one- 3 half metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent shall be treated as 4 released for every million pounds of coal attributable to such entity; 5 an amount equivalent to four hundred thirty-two thousand one hundred 6 eighty metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent shall be treated as 7 released for every million barrels of crude oil attributable to such 8 entity; and an amount equivalent to fifty-three thousand four hundred 9 forty metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent shall be treated as 10 released for every million cubic feet of fuel gases attributable to such 11 entity] the department may: i. require an entity to provide information 12 to the department related to past practices, production, extraction, 13 refining, emissions, or other historical information about such entity 14 necessary or appropriate to enable the department to determine whether 15 such entity is a responsible party and, if so, the amount of such 16 responsible party's covered greenhouse gas emissions; ii. apply consist- 17 ent emissions factors, consistent with the climate leadership and commu- 18 nity protection act pursuant to chapter one hundred six of the laws of 19 two thousand nineteen, to convert extraction and refining data into 20 greenhouse gas emissions; and iii. utilize information received from the 21 department of taxation and finance pursuant to subdivision (a) of 22 section three hundred fourteen of the tax law. 23 e. i. The department shall issue notices of cost recovery demand to 24 all responsible parties at the times set forth in paragraph a of subdi- 25 vision four of this section. Payment of a cost recovery demand shall be 26 made in full on the applicable payment date provided that, notwithstand- 27 ing paragraph a of subdivision two of this section, the department may 28 provide that a responsible party may elect to pay an amount no greater 29 than ninety-two percent of the amount of the cost recovery demand after 30 the applicable payment date. Any such payments permitted to be made 31 after the applicable payment date shall be made within twenty-four years 32 of the applicable payment date, shall be no less frequent than annual 33 beginning in the year following the applicable payment date, and shall 34 not increase over time. 35 ii. Any responsible party who fails to make a payment required pursu- 36 ant to this subdivision shall pay a penalty of fifty per centum of the 37 unpaid payment amount, plus interest on the unpaid payment amount 38 computed in accordance with section 6621(a)(2) of the United States 39 internal revenue code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. section 1 et 40 seq.) from the date the payment was required to be paid. 41 f. [The commissioner may adjust the cost recovery demand amount of a 42 responsible party refining petroleum products (or who is a successor in 43 interest to such an entity) if such responsible party establishes to the 44 satisfaction of the commissioner that a portion of the cost recovery 45 demand amount was attributable to the refining of crude oil extracted by 46 another responsible party (or who is a successor in interest to such an 47 entity) that accounted for such crude oil in determining its cost recov- 48 ery demand amount. 49 g. Payment of a cost recovery demand shall be made in full on the 50 applicable payment date unless a responsible party elects to pay in 51 installments pursuant to paragraph h of this subdivision. 52 h. A responsible party may elect to pay the cost recovery demand 53 amount in twenty-four annual installments, eight percent of the total 54 due in the first installment and four percent of the total due in each 55 of the following twenty-three installments. If an election is made under 56 this paragraph, the first installment shall be paid on the applicable A. 1474 7 1 payment date and each subsequent installment shall be paid on the same 2 date as the applicable payment date in each succeeding year. 3 i.] If there is any addition to the original amount of the final cost 4 recovery demand as of the applicable payment date for failure to timely 5 pay any [installment] amount required to be paid under this subdivision, 6 a liquidation or sale of substantially all the assets of the responsible 7 party (including in a proceeding under U.S. Code: Title 11 or similar 8 case), a cessation of business by the responsible party, or any similar 9 circumstance, then the unpaid balance of all [remaining installments] 10 unpaid amounts shall be due on the date of such event (or in the case of 11 a proceeding under U.S. Code: Title 11 or similar case, on the day 12 before the petition is filed). The preceding sentence shall not apply to 13 the sale of substantially all of the assets of a responsible party to a 14 buyer if such buyer enters into an agreement with the department under 15 which such buyer is liable for [the remaining installments] all unpaid 16 amounts due [under this subdivision] in the same manner as if such buyer 17 were the responsible party. 18 4. a. Within [one year] thirty months of the effective date of this 19 article, the department shall promulgate such regulations as are neces- 20 sary or appropriate to carry out this article, including but not limited 21 to: 22 i. provisions for the department to require an entity to provide 23 information to the department related to past practices, production, 24 extraction, refining, emissions, or other historical information about 25 such entity necessary or appropriate to enable the department to deter- 26 mine whether such entity is a responsible party and, if so, the amount 27 of such responsible party's covered greenhouse gas emissions; 28 ii. adopting uniform and consistent methodologies using the best 29 available [science] information, such as publicly available databases of 30 historical production data, to determine responsible parties and their 31 applicable share of covered greenhouse gas emissions consistent with the 32 provisions of this article; 33 [ii.] iii. registering entities that are responsible parties under the 34 program; 35 [iii.] iv. issuing notices of cost recovery demand [to responsible 36 parties informing them of the cost recovery demand amount; how and where 37 cost recovery demands can be paid; the potential consequences of nonpay- 38 ment and late payment; and information regarding their rights to contest 39 an assessment], no later than June thirtieth of the fourth calendar year 40 following the effective date of this article, for each responsible 41 party's cost recovery demand; 42 [iv.] v. establishing a process such that: 43 (1) a responsible party may file a request for reconsideration of its 44 cost recovery demand with the department within sixty days following 45 service of the notice of cost recovery demand if within the United 46 States, and within ninety days following such service outside the United 47 States, and in doing so shall exhaust administrative remedies; 48 (2) a request for reconsideration shall state the grounds for the 49 request and include supporting documentation, which may include but is 50 not limited to documentation of the party's covered greenhouse gas emis- 51 sions and the party's contacts with the state; 52 (3) the department shall consider whether any such requests for recon- 53 sideration, including whether a responsible party refining petroleum 54 products, or who is a successor in interest to such an entity, estab- 55 lishes to the satisfaction of the department that a portion of the cost 56 recovery demand amount was attributable to the refining of crude oil A. 1474 8 1 extracted by a responsible party, or who is a successor in interest to 2 such an entity, that was accounted for in determining the cost recovery 3 demand amount of such responsible party, and whether notices of cost 4 recovery demand should be updated, and shall issue updated notices of 5 cost recovery demand, if applicable, which shall include a statement of 6 the grounds of the department's determination, within sixty days follow- 7 ing the expiration of all periods for submitting a request for reconsid- 8 eration under item one of this subparagraph; 9 (4) if notices of cost recovery demand issued pursuant to item three 10 of this subparagraph result in a new responsible party receiving a 11 notice of cost recovery demand that was not issued a notice of cost 12 recovery demand by the date required by subparagraph iv of this para- 13 graph, then, in the same manner as set forth in items one, two and three 14 of this subparagraph, such responsible party shall have sixty days from 15 service within the United States, and ninety days from service outside 16 the United States, to file a request for reconsideration, which filing 17 shall exhaust such responsible party's administrative remedies, and the 18 department shall consider such request for reconsideration and issue 19 updated notices of cost recovery demand, if applicable, in the manner 20 contemplated by item three of this subparagraph; 21 (5) if any updating of notices of cost recovery demand pursuant to 22 such processes for reconsideration results in a new responsible party 23 that was not previously issued a cost recovery demand, such new respon- 24 sible party shall also be given the opportunity to file a request for 25 reconsideration in the same manner as set forth in item four of this 26 subparagraph, and such process shall continue until no new responsible 27 party results from issuance of notices of cost recovery demand; and 28 (6) if the processes in this subparagraph result in issuances of 29 notices of cost recovery demand after the applicable payment date, then 30 the applicable payment date shall be the date which is thirty days after 31 the final issuance of notices of cost recovery demand; and 32 vi. accepting payments from, pursuing collection efforts against, and 33 negotiating settlements with responsible parties[; and 34 v. adopting procedures for identifying and selecting climate change 35 adaptive infrastructure projects eligible to receive qualifying expendi- 36 tures, including legislative budget appropriations, issuance of requests 37 for proposals from localities and not-for-profit and community organiza- 38 tions, grants to private individuals, or other methods as determined by 39 the department, and for dispersing moneys from the fund for qualifying 40 expenditures. When considering projects intended to stabilize tidal 41 shorelines, the department shall encourage the use of nature-based 42 solutions. Total qualifying expenditures shall be allocated in such a 43 way as to achieve a goal that at least forty percent of the qualified 44 expenditures from the program, but not less than thirty-five percent of 45 such expenditures, shall go to climate change adaptive infrastructure 46 projects that benefit disadvantaged communities as defined in section 47 75-0101 of this chapter]. 48 b. The department shall hold at least two public hearings, one in-per- 49 son and one virtual, on proposed regulations, with a minimum of thirty 50 days' public notice in compliance with the provisions of article seven 51 of the public officers law. 52 5. The department shall develop procedures to make publicly avail- 53 able, by posting on its website, all data related to fossil fuel 54 extraction and refining by entities which the department obtains pursu- 55 ant to the program, to the maximum extent practicable. A. 1474 9 1 6. Within [two years] eighteen months of the [effective date of this 2 article] promulgation of the final regulations pursuant to subdivision 3 four of this section, the department shall complete a statewide climate 4 change adaptation [master] and resilience plan, which shall be publicly 5 available, including at a minimum on the department's website, and 6 updated no less than every three years following the procedures of this 7 subdivision, for the purpose of guiding the dispersal of funds, pursuant 8 to section ninety-seven-m of the state finance law, to all regions of 9 the state in a timely, efficient, and equitable manner [to all regions 10 of the state] in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. In 11 completing such plan, the department shall: 12 a. collaborate with the department of state, [empire state develop- 13 ment] homes and community renewal, the department of agriculture and 14 markets, the New York state energy research and development authority, 15 the department of public service, the department of transportation, the 16 department of health, the division of budget and the [New York independ- 17 ent systems operator] division of homeland security and emergency 18 services; 19 b. assess the adaptation needs [and vulnerabilities] of various areas 20 vital to the state's economy, normal functioning, and the health and 21 well-being of New Yorkers, including but not limited to: agriculture, 22 biodiversity, ecosystem services, education, finance, healthcare, manu- 23 facturing, housing and [real estate] land use, retail, tourism (includ- 24 ing state and municipal parks), transportation, and municipal and local 25 government. 26 c. identify major potential, proposed, and ongoing climate change 27 adaptive infrastructure projects throughout the state; 28 d. identify opportunities for alignment with existing federal, state, 29 and local funding streams; 30 e. identify potential municipal, not-for-profit, and community organ- 31 ization grant programs; 32 f. include in such plan project criteria, project types and recommen- 33 dations for identifying and selecting climate change adaptive infras- 34 tructure projects eligible to receive qualifying expenditures. When 35 considering projects intended to stabilize tidal shorelines, the depart- 36 ment shall encourage the use of nature-based solutions; 37 g. consult with stakeholders, including local governments, businesses, 38 environmental advocates, the federally designated bulk system operator, 39 relevant subject area experts, and representatives of disadvantaged 40 communities; and 41 [f.] h. provide opportunities for public engagement in all regions of 42 the state, including by holding at least two public hearings, one 43 in-person and one virtual, with meaningful opportunities for partic- 44 ipation and public comment from all segments of the population, includ- 45 ing persons living in disadvantaged communities as identified pursuant 46 to section 75-0111 of this chapter, a minimum of sixty days' public 47 notice in compliance with the provisions of article seven of the public 48 officers law, on a draft of the plan, a summary and analysis of the 49 public comments and a description of any changes made to the plan based 50 on the public comments received. 51 [6.] 7. Total qualifying expenditures shall be allocated in such a 52 way as to achieve a goal that at least forty percent of the qualified 53 expenditures from the program, but not less than thirty-five percent of 54 such expenditures, shall go to climate change adaptive infrastructure 55 projects that benefit disadvantaged communities as defined in section 56 75-0101 of this chapter. A. 1474 10 1 8. The department[, the department of taxation and finance,] and the 2 attorney general are hereby authorized to implement and enforce the 3 provisions of this article. 4 [7. The department or the department of taxation and finance shall 5 provide an opportunity to be heard to any responsible parties that seek 6 to contest a cost recovery demand. Determinations made in favor of a 7 petitioner after such hearing shall be final and conclusive. A determi- 8 nation in favor of the state may be appealed under article seventy-eight 9 of the civil practice law and rules. 10 8.] 9. Moneys received from cost recovery demands shall be deposited 11 in the climate change adaptation fund established pursuant to section 12 ninety-seven-m of the state finance law. 13 [9.] 10. a. The department shall conduct an [independent] evaluation 14 of the climate change adaptation cost recovery program. The purpose of 15 this evaluation is to determine the effectiveness of the program in 16 achieving its purposes as defined in subdivision two of this section. 17 Such evaluation shall include, at minimum: 18 i. a list of all responsible parties and their respective cost recov- 19 ery demands, as well as any changes to an entity's status as a responsi- 20 ble party during the preceding program year; 21 ii. an accounting of all cost recovery demands made to responsible 22 parties, actual monies collected, and penalties or other collection 23 measures taken during the preceding program year; 24 iii. an accounting of all expenditures from the climate change adapta- 25 tion fund established pursuant to section ninety-seven-m of the state 26 finance law, including at a minimum: 27 (1) expenditures that benefit disadvantaged communities as defined in 28 section 75-0101 of this chapter; 29 (2) expenditures by project type; 30 (3) expenditures by percentage of overall funding used for grant 31 programs for municipalities and not-for-profit and community organiza- 32 tions; and 33 (4) expenditures for administration and implementation support; 34 iv. a review of climate change adaptive infrastructure projects' 35 status, including the number of projects that have been completed and 36 those projects which have been identified and remain unfunded; 37 v. a summary of the geographic distribution of climate change adaptive 38 infrastructure projects; and 39 vi. identification of future spending needs. 40 b. Such evaluation shall be made public on the department's website 41 and provided to the governor, the temporary president of the senate and 42 the speaker of the assembly on or before January first of the second 43 calendar year following the year in which this article is enacted into 44 law, and annually on or before September thirtieth thereafter. 45 [c. Any entity contracted by the department to conduct such evaluation 46 shall receive prompt payment of all moneys due upon completion of such 47 evaluation.] 11. The department shall publish all information, requests 48 for proposals, application forms, procedures and guidelines relating to 49 climate change adaptive infrastructure projects on its website and in a 50 manner that is accessible to the public and all potential recipients. 51 § 76-0105. Requirements for climate change adaptive infrastructure 52 projects. 53 For each contract for climate change adaptive infrastructure projects, 54 funded in part or in whole from the climate change adaptation fund 55 established pursuant to section ninety-seven-m of the state finance law, 56 by a public entity, or a third party acting on behalf and for the bene- A. 1474 11 1 fit of a public entity, the "public work" for the purposes of this 2 subdivision shall ensure that such contract shall contain a provision 3 that the iron and steel used or supplied in the performance of the 4 contract or any subcontract thereto, shall be produced or made in whole 5 or substantial part in the United States, its territories or 6 possessions. In the case of an iron or steel product all manufacturing 7 must take place in the United States, from the initial melting stage 8 through the application of coatings, except metallurgical processes 9 involving the refinement of steel additives. 10 § 4. Section 224-f of the labor law, as added by section 3 of part TT 11 of chapter 56 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 12 § 224-f. Wage requirements for certain climate risk-related and energy 13 transition projects. 1. For purposes of this section, a "covered climate 14 risk-related and energy transition project" means a construction project 15 that receives at least one hundred thousand dollars of funds from the 16 New York climate action fund climate investment account established 17 pursuant to section ninety-nine-qq of the state finance law or the 18 climate change adaptation fund established pursuant to section ninety- 19 seven-m of the state finance law. 20 2. A covered climate risk-related and energy transition project shall 21 be subject to prevailing wage requirements in accordance with sections 22 two hundred twenty, two hundred twenty-a, two hundred twenty-b, two 23 hundred twenty-i, two hundred twenty-three, and two hundred 24 twenty-four-b of this article, provided that a covered climate risk-re- 25 lated and energy transition project may still otherwise be considered a 26 covered project pursuant to section two hundred twenty or two hundred 27 twenty-four-a of this article if it meets the definition therein. 28 3. For purposes of this section, a covered climate risk-related and 29 energy transition project shall exclude: 30 a. Privately owned construction work performed under a pre-hire 31 collective bargaining agreement between an owner or developer and a bona 32 fide building and construction trades labor organization which has 33 established itself, and/or its affiliates, as the collective bargaining 34 representative for all persons who will perform work on such a project, 35 and which provides that only contractors and subcontractors who sign a 36 pre-negotiated agreement with the labor organization can perform work on 37 such a project; or 38 b. Construction work on one- or two-family dwellings where the proper- 39 ty is the owner's primary residence, or construction work performed on 40 property where the owner of the property owns no more than four dwelling 41 units; or 42 c. Construction work performed on a multiple residence and/or ancil- 43 lary amenities or installations that is wholly privately owned in any of 44 the following circumstances: 45 (i) where no less than twenty-five percent of the residential units 46 are affordable and shall be retained subject to an anticipated regulato- 47 ry agreement with a local, state, or federal governmental entity, or a 48 not-for-profit entity with an anticipated formal agreement with a local, 49 state, or federal governmental entity for purposes of providing afforda- 50 ble housing in a given locality or region provided that the period of 51 affordability for a residential unit deemed affordable under the 52 provisions of this paragraph shall be for no less than fifteen years 53 from the date of construction; or 54 (ii) where no less than thirty-five percent of the residential units 55 involves the provision of supportive housing services for vulnerable A. 1474 12 1 populations provided that such units are subject to an anticipated regu- 2 latory agreement with a local, state, or federal governmental entity. 3 4. As a condition of receiving funds from the New York climate action 4 fund climate investment account established pursuant to section ninety- 5 nine-qq of the state finance law or from the climate change adaptation 6 fund established pursuant to section ninety-seven-m of the state finance 7 law for a covered climate risk-related and energy transition project, 8 the owner or developer of such covered climate risk-related and energy 9 transition project, or a third party acting on such owner's or develop- 10 er's behalf, shall agree to enter into a labor peace agreement with at 11 least one bona fide labor organization either: 12 a. where such bona fide labor organization is actively representing 13 non-construction employees who will be working within the covered 14 climate risk-related and energy transition project once built; or 15 b. upon notice by a bona fide labor organization that is attempting to 16 represent such non-construction employees. 17 5. For purposes of this section "labor peace agreement" means an 18 agreement between an owner and/or developer and labor organization that, 19 at a minimum, protects the state's proprietary interests by prohibiting 20 labor organizations and members from engaging in picketing, work stop- 21 pages, boycotts, and any other economic interference. 22 6. The owner or developer using funds from the New York climate action 23 fund climate investment account established pursuant to section ninety- 24 nine-qq of the state finance law or from the climate change adaptation 25 fund established pursuant to section ninety-seven-m of the state finance 26 law for a covered climate risk-related and energy transition project 27 pursuant to this section shall: 28 a. require the use of apprenticeship agreements as defined by article 29 twenty-three of this chapter; or for industries without apprenticeship 30 programs, require the use of workforce training, preferably in conjunc- 31 tion with a bona fide labor organization; and 32 b. consider use of registered pre-apprenticeship direct entry programs 33 for the recruitment of local and/or disadvantaged workers. 34 7. For purposes of this section, the "fiscal officer" shall be deemed 35 to be the commissioner. The enforcement of any covered climate risk-re- 36 lated and energy transition project under this section shall be subject 37 to the requirements of sections two hundred twenty, two hundred twen- 38 ty-a, two hundred twenty-b, two hundred twenty-i, two hundred twenty- 39 three, two hundred twenty-four-b of this article, and section two 40 hundred twenty-seven of this chapter and within the jurisdiction of the 41 fiscal officer; provided, however, nothing contained in this section 42 shall be deemed to construe any covered climate risk-related and energy 43 transition project as otherwise being considered public work pursuant to 44 this article. 45 8. The fiscal officer may issue rules and regulations governing the 46 provisions of this section. Violations of this section shall be grounds 47 for determinations and orders pursuant to section two hundred twenty-b 48 of this article. 49 9. For any building service work on a covered climate risk-related and 50 energy transition project, prevailing wage shall be paid consistent with 51 article nine of this chapter. 52 10. Any public entity receiving at least five million dollars in funds 53 from the New York climate action fund climate investment account estab- 54 lished pursuant to section ninety-nine-qq of the state finance law or 55 from the climate change adaptation fund established pursuant to section 56 ninety-seven-m of the state finance law for a project which involves the A. 1474 13 1 construction, reconstruction, alteration, maintenance, moving, demoli- 2 tion, excavation, development or other improvement of any building, 3 structure or land, shall be subject to section two hundred twenty-two of 4 this article. 5 § 5. Subdivision (a) of section 314 of the tax law, as amended by 6 chapter 190 of the laws of 1990, is amended to read as follows: 7 (a) General.[--] Except in accordance with proper judicial order or as 8 otherwise provided by law, it shall be unlawful for any tax commission- 9 er, any officer or employee of the department of taxation and finance, 10 or any person who, pursuant to this section, is permitted to inspect any 11 return, or to whom any information contained in any return is furnished, 12 or any person engaged or retained by such department on an independent 13 contract basis, or any person who in any manner may acquire knowledge of 14 the contents of a return filed pursuant to this article, to divulge or 15 make known in any manner the amount of income or gross receipts or any 16 particulars set forth or disclosed in any return under this article. The 17 officers charged with the custody of such returns shall not be required 18 to produce any of them or evidence of anything contained in them in any 19 action or proceeding in any court, except on behalf of the state or the 20 commissioner of taxation and finance in an action or proceeding under 21 the provisions of this chapter or in any other action or proceeding 22 involving the collection of a tax due under this chapter to which the 23 state or the commissioner is a party or a claimant, or on behalf of any 24 party to any action or proceeding under the provisions of this article 25 when the returns or facts shown thereby are directly involved in such 26 action or proceeding, in any of which events the court may require the 27 production of, and may admit in evidence, so much of said returns or of 28 the facts shown thereby as are pertinent to the action or proceeding and 29 no more. The commissioner may, nevertheless, publish a copy or a summary 30 of any determination or decision rendered after the formal hearing 31 provided for in this chapter. Nothing herein shall be construed to 32 prohibit the delivery to a petroleum business or its duly authorized 33 representative of a copy of any return filed by it, nor to prohibit the 34 publication of statistics so classified as to prevent the identification 35 of particular returns and the items thereof, or the disclosure of data 36 other than taxpayer identity information from a return or returns of one 37 or more petroleum or fossil fuel businesses to the department of envi- 38 ronmental conservation or the New York state energy research and devel- 39 opment authority for the purpose of implementing the New York state 40 climate change superfund act, or the publication of delinquent lists 41 showing the names of petroleum businesses who have failed to pay their 42 taxes at the time and in the manner provided by section three hundred 43 eight of this article together with any relevant information which in 44 the opinion of the commissioner may assist in the collection of such 45 delinquent taxes; or the inspection by the attorney general or other 46 legal representatives of the state of the return of any petroleum busi- 47 ness which shall bring action to set aside or review the tax based ther- 48 eon, or against whom an action or proceeding under this chapter has been 49 recommended by the commissioner or the attorney general or has been 50 instituted; or the inspection of the returns of any petroleum business 51 by the comptroller or duly designated officer or employee of the state 52 department of audit and control, for purposes of the audit of a refund 53 of any tax paid by such petroleum business under this article. Provided, 54 further, nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the disclosure of 55 taxpayer identity information, including name, mailing address and 56 taxpayer identifying number (social security account number, or such A. 1474 14 1 other number as has been assigned by the secretary of the United States 2 treasury or [his] such secretary's delegate, or by the commissioner of 3 taxation and finance), with respect to persons who are registered as 4 residual petroleum product or aviation fuel businesses under this arti- 5 cle or as distributors of motor fuel or diesel motor fuel or kero-jet 6 fuel only for the purpose of article twelve-A of this chapter or this 7 article, whose registration as a residual petroleum product business or 8 as such distributor has been cancelled or suspended pursuant to this 9 article or such article twelve-A or whose application for registration 10 as a residual petroleum product business or as such distributor has been 11 refused pursuant to this article or such article twelve-A. In addition, 12 the commissioner may disclose the fact that a person is not registered 13 as a residual petroleum business under this article or as a distributor 14 of motor fuel, diesel motor fuel or kero-jet fuel only under article 15 twelve-A of this chapter. Information disclosed pursuant to this subdi- 16 vision shall not, by itself, be construed as proof of compliance or 17 noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter. 18 § 6. Section 97-m of the state finance law, as added by a chapter of 19 the laws of 2024 amending the environmental conservation law, relating 20 to establishing the climate change adaptation cost recovery program; and 21 amending the state finance law relating to establishing the climate 22 change adaptation fund, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 23 2129-B and A. 3351-B, is amended to read as follows: 24 § 97-m. Climate change adaptation fund. 1. There is hereby established 25 in the custody of the comptroller and the commissioner of taxation and 26 finance a special [revolving] revenue fund to be known as the "climate 27 change adaptation fund" for the purpose of receiving moneys through cost 28 recovery demands and issuing funds for qualifying expenditures pursuant 29 to the climate change adaptation cost recovery program established in 30 article seventy-six of the environmental conservation law. 31 2. No monies shall be expended from the fund for any [project] purpose 32 except: 33 a. following appropriation by the legislature, qualifying expenditures 34 pursuant to the program, including their operation and maintenance, as 35 well as reasonable costs and expenses incurred by state entities for 36 administering and directly supporting the implementation of climate 37 change adaptive infrastructure projects under the program; provided, 38 however, that no more than one percent of the receipts of the fund may 39 be used for such administrative or implementation costs; and 40 b. Following appropriation or authorization by the legislature, trans- 41 fer to other funds for investments, payments or benefits directly 42 related to such climate change adaptive infrastructure projects, as 43 appropriate. 44 3. Any appropriation for qualifying expenditures shall indicate by 45 project type the amount of qualifying expenditures to be made available, 46 however, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 47 amounts associated with various project types shall be fully inter- 48 changeable within the overall appropriation. 49 4. Revenues in the fund shall be kept separate and shall not be 50 commingled with any other moneys in the custody of the comptroller or 51 the commissioner of taxation and finance. All deposits of such revenues 52 shall, if required by the comptroller, be secured by obligations of the 53 United States or of the state having a market value equal at all times 54 to the amount of such deposits and all banks and trust companies are 55 authorized to give security for such deposits. Any such revenues in such 56 fund may, upon the discretion of the comptroller, be invested in obli- A. 1474 15 1 gations in which the comptroller is authorized to invest pursuant to 2 section ninety-eight-a of this article. 3 [4.] 5. All payments of moneys from the fund shall be made on the 4 audit and warrant of the comptroller. 5 § 7. Section 6 of a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the environ- 6 mental conservation law relating to establishing the climate change 7 adaptation cost recovery program; and amending the state finance law 8 relating to establishing the climate change adaptation fund, as proposed 9 in legislative bills numbers S. 2129-B and A. 3351-B, is amended to read 10 as follows: 11 § 6. Severability. If any word, phrase, clause, sentence, paragraph, 12 section, or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of competent 13 jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair, or 14 invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation 15 to the word, phrase, clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part ther- 16 eof directly involved in the controversy in which such judgment shall 17 have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of the legis- 18 lature that this act would have been enacted even if such invalid 19 provisions had not been included herein. 20 § 8. Severability. If any word, phrase, clause, sentence, paragraph, 21 section, or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of competent 22 jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair, or 23 invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation 24 to the word, phrase, clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part ther- 25 eof directly involved in the controversy in which such judgment shall 26 have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of the legis- 27 lature that this act would have been enacted even if such invalid 28 provisions had not been included herein. 29 § 9. Construction. This act, being necessary for the general health, 30 safety, and welfare of the people of this state, shall be liberally 31 construed to effect its purpose. 32 § 10. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 33 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the environmental 34 conservation law relating to establishing the climate change adaptation 35 cost recovery program; and amending the state finance law relating to 36 establishing the climate change adaptation fund, as proposed in legisla- 37 tive bills numbers S. 2129-B and A. 3351-B, takes effect.